Tennessee, session 114, SB1943.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 15, Chapter 2, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
September 10 of each year is to be observed as "Charlie Kirk Day," to honor his
legacy and his exemplary service to our nation and the spreading of the Gospel.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010849